Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1423
Notice.

All notices by the department required by the motor fuel laws shall be mailed or electronically transmitted to the address of the licensee or permitholder as shown on the records of the department.

Laws 2018, LB177, § 9.
July 19, 2018